Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-518
Practice of audiology or speech-language pathology; temporary license; granted; when.

A temporary license to practice audiology or speech-language pathology may be granted to:

(1) A military spouse as provided in section 38-129.01; or

(2) A person who establishes residence in Nebraska, or a person who is a resident of a member state of the Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology Interstate Compact, if such person:

(a) Meets all the requirements for a license except passage of the examination required by section 38-515, which temporary license shall be valid only until the date on which the results of the next licensure examination are available to the department and shall not be renewed; or

(b) Meets all the requirements for a license except completion of the professional experience required by section 38-515, which temporary license shall be valid only until the sooner of completion of such professional experience or eighteen months and shall not be renewed.

Laws 1978, LB 406, § 21;

Laws 1985, LB 129, § 22;

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 68;

Laws 1991, LB 456, § 28;

Laws 2001, LB 209, § 12;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 59;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,194;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 203;

Laws 2017, LB88, § 39;

Laws 2021, LB14, § 3.

Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology Interstate Compact, see section 38-4101.